Utah statutes.
53A-1a-105.   Parental participation in educational process -- Employer support.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes the importance of parental participation in the educational process in order for students to achieve and maintain high levels of performance.

(2)  It is, therefore, the policy of the state to:

(a) encourage parents to provide a home environment that values education and send their children to school prepared to learn;

(b)  rely upon school districts and schools to provide opportunities for parents of students to be involved in establishing and implementing educational goals for their respective schools and students; and

(c)  expect employers to recognize the need for parents and members of the community to participate in the public education system in order to help students achieve and maintain excellence.

(3) (a)  Each local school board shall adopt a policy on parental involvement in the schools of the district.

(b)  The board shall design its policy to build consistent and effective communication among parents, teachers, and administrators.

(c)  The policy shall provide parents with the opportunity to be actively involved in their children's education and to be informed of:

(i)  the importance of the involvement of parents in directly affecting the success of their children's educational efforts; and

(ii)  groups and organizations that may provide instruction and training to parents to help improve their children's academic success and support their academic efforts.

